Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF936.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ROCHESTER; ROCHESTER INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT PARKING SOLAR ARRAY AND ELECTRIC VEHICLE CHARGING STATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $3,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to the city of Rochester for predesign, design, engineering, site debris removal and pavement reconstruction, and construction of airport parking solar array and electric vehicle charging station at the Rochester International Airport. Amounts expended by the city of Rochester for predesign, design, and engineering for this project prior to the enactment of this section shall count toward the nonstate match. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $3,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end